Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Chapter 2 Licenses; Fees

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 5 provides: “The department shall annually report to the governor and the legislature on all revenues available to the department including fees for licenses, stamps and permits issued by the commission and the need for an adjustment to these fees based upon changes in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services, as published by the United States department of commerce, and the resulting impact upon the operations of the department.”

Notice. —

Laws 1997, ch. 79, § 3, provides: “The game and fish department shall, through its publications, and other reasonable means, including providing information when mailing licenses to successful applicants, notify all applicants for game and fish licenses of the provisions of W.S.

23-2-418

.”

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2001, House Joint Resolution No. 1, §§ 1 through 3, requests that Congress not reintroduce threatened or endangered species into the state of Wyoming without the consent and approval of the state and without providing the necessary funding.